test/src/morphology/A-tiiera_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Adjective - tīera: # adjectives 54 'eng /est terve/fin' - full paradigm
     tīera+A+Sg+Nom: tīera
     tīera+A+Sg+Gen: tīera
     tīera+A+Sg+Par: tierrõ
     tīera+A+Sg+Dat: tīeran
     tīera+A+Sg+Ins: [tierrõks, +]
     tīera+A+Sg+Ill: tīerrõ
     tīera+A+Sg+Ela: tīerast
     tīera+A+Pl+Nom: tierrõd
     tīera+A+Pl+Gen: tierrõd
     tīera+A+Pl+Par: tierridi
     tīera+A+Pl+Dat: tierrõdõn
     tīera+A+Pl+Ins: tierrõdõks
     tīera+A+Pl+Ill: tierriž
     tīera+A+Pl+Ela: tierrist
